Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2886.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 10, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1530, to read: START_STATUTE41-1530. Technical assistance program; native business owners; authority; rules A. The technical assistance program for native business owners is established in the authority. B. The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section, including the following: 1. How to prioritize cooperatives, artisans and rural businesses. 2. How to expand state procurement preferences for businesses owned by native business owners. END_STATUTE